Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB647.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 302. Powers and Duties of County Boards.--The county boards of elections, within their respective counties, shall exercise, in the manner provided by this act, all powers granted to them by this act, and shall perform all the duties imposed upon them by this act, which shall include the following:12345678910111213141516171819202122 * * *(q) To enter into an agreement with the unified judicial system to receive a record of any county resident who claims ineligibility for service as a juror under 42 Pa.C.S. § 4502 (relating to qualifications of jurors) and to investigate the registration status of any registered elector who claimed ineligibility to serve as a juror on the basis of a lack of citizenship.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0647PN0656 - 2 - 123456789